Massachusetts, session 194th, H2914.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding sections 65A, 65B and 65D of chapter 32 of the General Laws, or any
other general or special law to the contrary, a retired chief justice, justice, associate justice,
judge, associate judge, or special justice, hereinafter referred to as a judge, who: (i) is a veteran
who served in the armed forces of the United States, (ii) was called into duty in the armed forces
of the United States while seated as a judge, and served at least 90 days in active duty in the
armed forces of the United States while seated as a judge, (iii) retired at the age of 70 under
Article LVIII of the Amendments to the Constitution with at least 10 years of continuous judicial
service or resigned after serving in office for at least 15 years continuously and attaining the age
of 65 years, and (iv) currently receives a pension related to such service as a judge, shall be
eligible for an increase in their pension to receive a pension for life at an annual rate equal to
three fourths of the current annual rate of regular compensation of a judge currently serving in
of 2

the same or similar position as the retired judge held at the time of their retirement, calculated as
of the date of the application for pension increase, beginning on the date such application was
approved by the retirement board pursuant to the second paragraph. A judge who retired at age
70 under Article LVII of the Amendments to the Constitution with less than 10 years of
continuous judicial service who otherwise meets the requirements of this act shall be eligible to
receive an increase in their pension by calculating such pension based on the current annual rate
of regular compensation of a judge currently serving in the same or similar position as the retired
judge held at the time of their retirement, calculated as of the date of the application for pension
increase, beginning on the date such application was approved by the retirement board pursuant
to the second paragraph.
Within 30 days after the effective date of this act, the state retirement board shall notify
all retired judges collecting a pension pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws, in writing by
certified mail, of the opportunity to apply for an increase in their pension pursuant to this act.
Said judges shall have 30 days after receipt of said notice to make application for such pension
increase, which shall include information, as the retirement board deems necessary, to determine
eligibility pursuant to this act. The retirement board shall make a determination on any
application submitted pursuant to this act within 30 days after receipt of such application, and
shall notify the applicant of such determination in writing not later than 10 days after such
determination is made.
of 2